Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Article 8. Directors and Officers; Dividends.

§ 6.2-860.
Bank to be managed by board of directors; number of directors.

The affairs of every bank incorporated under the laws of the Commonwealth shall be managed by a board of directors. The board shall consist of not less than five individuals.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-36; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-45; 1996, c. 268; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-861.
Application of Virginia Stock Corporation Act.

The provisions of the Virginia Stock Corporation Act (§

13.1-601

et seq.) relating to officers of a corporation shall apply to banks except that, if a bank shall not appoint a secretary, the cashier of a bank shall be deemed to be the secretary of the corporation.

History.

1966, c. 584, § 6.1-46; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-862.
Directors to own stock in bank.

As used in this section, “bank holding company” means (i) a bank holding company as defined in §

6.2-800

or (ii) any corporation organized under the laws of the Commonwealth and doing business in the Commonwealth that owns all of the capital stock of one bank, except those shares issued as directors’ qualifying shares, and at least 66 and two-thirds percent of the assets of the holding company, computed on a consolidated basis, consists of assets held by such bank and controlled subsidiaries of such bank.

Every director of a bank incorporated under the laws of the Commonwealth shall be the sole owner of, and have in his personal possession or control, shares of stock in such bank having a book value of not less than $5,000, calculated as of the last business day of the calendar year immediately preceding the election of the director. So long as a director shall successively be reelected, there shall be no requirement to increase the shares of stock owned according to this section. Such stock shall be unpledged and unencumbered at the time such director becomes a director and during the whole of his term as such. A director shall be deemed to be the sole owner of, and have in his personal possession or control:

Shares held through a brokerage account or similar arrangement, provided that the director retains sole beneficial ownership and sole legal control over the shares;

Shares held jointly or as a tenant in common, but only to the extent of the book value of the shares divided by the number of joint or tenant in common holders;

Shares deposited by the director in a living trust, or inter vivos trust, as to which the director is a trustee and retains an absolute power of revocation; or

Shares held through a profit-sharing plan, individual retirement account, retirement plan, or similar arrangement, provided that the director retains sole beneficial ownership and sole legal control over the shares.

When a bank is controlled by a bank holding company, a director may comply with the requirements of subsection B for each bank of which he is a director by ownership, in similar manner, of shares of capital stock of the bank holding company having an aggregate book value equal to the book value of shares of bank stock that he would be obligated to own under subsection B.

A director of a bankers’ bank shall not be required to own or control any shares of stock of such bankers’ bank or any shares of stock of a bank holding company that controls such bankers’ bank.

Any director violating the provisions of this section shall, immediately, vacate his office.

The requirements of this section shall not apply to any person duly elected a director of a bank prior to July 1, 1995, or so long as such person shall successively be reelected a director, and as to such person the requirements of the law prior to such date shall apply.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-37; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-47; 1970, c. 95; 1995, c. 63; 1996, cc. 25, 218; 2010, c. 794; 2014, cc. 156, 219; 2018, cc. 76, 262.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 156 and 219 are identical, and amended subsection B by adding a sentence to the end and subdivisions 1 through 4.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 76 and 262 are identical, and substituted “a trustee” for “the sole trustee” in subdivision B 3.

§ 6.2-863.
Oaths of directors.

Every director of a bank incorporated under the laws of the Commonwealth shall, within 30 days after his election or reelection, take and subscribe to an oath that:

He will diligently and honestly perform his duties as director; and

He is the owner and has in his personal possession or control, standing in his sole name on the books of the bank or bank holding company as defined in subsection A of §

6.2-862

, unpledged and unencumbered in any way, shares of stock of the bank of which he is a director or, if a bank is controlled by a bank holding company as defined in §

6.2-800

, shares of stock of the bank holding company, having a book value of not less than the amounts respectively prescribed by §

6.2-862

, and, in case of reelection or reappointment, that during the whole of his immediate previous term as a director, the stock was not at any time pledged or in any other manner encumbered or hypothecated to secure a loan.

The oath subscribed to by such director, certified by the officer before whom it is taken, shall be transmitted by the cashier of such bank to the Commission. Any director who fails for a period of 30 days after his election or appointment to take the oath as required by this section shall automatically forfeit his office.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-39; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-48; 1992, c. 552; 1994, c. 105; 2010, c. 794; 2014, cc. 156, 219.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 156 and 219 are identical, and in subdivision A 2, substituted “book” for “par.”

§ 6.2-864.
Report to Commission of election of director.

Within 60 days following the election or reelection of any person as a director of a bank, the bank shall furnish to the Commission such information as the Commission shall from time to time prescribe regarding the director’s personal character, integrity, financial condition, and personal and business background. The report shall be signed under oath by the director and a designated officer of the bank. Any person knowingly making a false statement in such a report is guilty of perjury and punishable as provided in §

18.2-434

.

History.

1968, c. 606, § 6.1-48.1; 1992, c. 552; 1994, c. 105; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-865.
Removal of director or officer; appeals; penalty.

Whenever any director or officer of a bank doing business in the Commonwealth shall continue (i) to violate any law relating to such bank or (ii) unsafe or unsound practices in conducting the business of such bank, after the director or officer, and the board of directors of the bank of which he is a director or officer, have been warned in writing by the Commissioner to discontinue such violation of law or such unsafe or unsound practices, the Commissioner shall certify the facts to the Commission. The Commission shall thereupon enter an order requiring such director or officer to appear before the Commission, within not less than 10 days, to show cause why he should not be removed from office and thereafter restrained from participating in any manner in the management of such bank. Such order shall contain a brief statement of the facts certified to the Commission by the Commissioner. A copy of such order shall be served upon such director or officer, and a copy thereof shall be sent by registered mail to each director of the bank affected.

If, after granting the accused director or officer a reasonable opportunity to be heard, the Commission shall find that he has continued to violate any law relating to such bank or has continued unsafe or unsound practices in conducting the business of such bank after he and the board of directors of the bank of which he is a director or officer have been warned as provided in subsection A, the Commission shall enter an order removing such director or officer from office and restraining such director or officer from thereafter participating in any manner in the management of such bank. A copy of such order shall be served upon such director or officer. A copy of such order shall also be served upon the bank of which he is a director or officer. Upon such removal, the director or officer shall cease to be a director or officer of such bank and thereafter shall cease to participate in any manner in the management of such bank.

Any director or officer aggrieved by (i) an order of the Commission entered under subsection B or (ii) an order refusing to remove another director or officer from office and to restrain him from participating in the management of the bank, shall have, of right, an appeal to the Supreme Court of Virginia within 60 days from the date of the order.

Any director or officer removed and restrained under the provisions of subsection B from participating in any manner in the management of any bank of which he is a director or officer, and who thereafter participates in any manner in the management of such bank except as a stockholder therein, is guilty of a Class 6 felony.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 6-40, 6-41, 6-42; 1966, c. 584, §§ 6.1-49, 6.1-50, 6.1-51; 1979, c. 58; 1992, c. 136; 2010, c. 794.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

§ 6.2-866.
Meetings of board of directors.

The board of directors of every bank shall hold meetings at least once in each calendar month. At each meeting of the board, a majority of the whole board shall be necessary for the lawful transaction of business. Notwithstanding the foregoing, (i) the shareholders, by bylaw, may fix any number not less than a majority as a quorum and (ii) the Commission may allow less frequent meetings, but not less often than quarterly.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-43; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-52; 1981, c. 203; 2010, c. 794; 2019, cc. 242, 244.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 242 and 244 are identical, and substituted “a majority as a quorum” for “five as a quorum.”

§ 6.2-867.
Discount by officer, director, or employee of paper refused by bank.

No officer, director, or employee of a bank may purchase or discount any note or paper at a rate of interest in excess of what such bank might charge knowing that such bank has refused to purchase or discount such paper.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-44; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-53; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-868.
Bonds required of officers and employees; blanket bond.

The board of directors of every bank shall require bonds from all of the active officials and employees of such corporation. In lieu of such bonds, the board may obtain one or more blanket bonds. A bank holding company may obtain a blanket bond covering all affiliate banks within the holding company. The surety on every bond shall be a bonding or surety company authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth. The penalty of any such bond shall be increased whenever in the opinion of the Commission it is necessary for the protection of the public interest.

If a bank is unable to obtain the bond required by this section, it shall immediately notify the Commission, which may then direct the bank to have an audit performed at its expense by an independent certified public accounting firm. The bank shall obtain blanket bond coverage as soon as such coverage is available. Failure to obtain blanket bond coverage may be cause for action by the Commission as provided by §

6.2-906

.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-46; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-54; 1974, c. 665; 1979, c. 52; 1992, c. 365; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-869.
Dividends; surplus; undivided profits.

The board of directors of any bank may declare a dividend of so much as the board shall judge expedient of the net undivided profits of the bank, after providing for all expenses, losses, interest and taxes accrued, or due by such bank. Before any such dividend is declared, any deficit in capital funds originally paid in shall have been restored by earnings to their initial level, and no dividend shall be declared or paid by any bank which would impair the paid-in capital of the bank.

To ascertain the net undivided profits before any dividend shall be declared, all debts due to such bank on which interest is past due and unpaid for a period of 12 months, unless the same are well secured and in process of collection by law, shall be deducted from the undivided profits in addition to all expenses, losses, interest and taxes accrued, and the balance shall be deemed to be the net undivided profits.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, the Commission may limit or approve the payment of dividends by the board of directors of any bank when the Commission determines that such limitation or approval is warranted by the financial condition of the bank.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-48; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-56; 1976, c. 658; 1979, c. 53; 1992, c. 48; 1995, c. 84; 2010, c. 794.